Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 1. Commencement of Proceedings.

§ 5201.
Commencement of delinquency proceedings.

Proceedings under this chapter shall be commenced by:

transfer to the court of a proceeding from another court as provided in section 5203 of this title; or

the filing of a delinquency petition by a State’s Attorney.

If the proceeding is commenced by transfer from another court, no petition need be filed; however, the State’s Attorney shall provide to the court the name and address of the child’s custodial parent, guardian, or custodian and the name and address of any noncustodial parent if known.

Any proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have committed an act specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title after attaining 14 years of age, but not 22 years of age, shall originate in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, provided that jurisdiction may be transferred in accordance with this chapter and chapter 52A of this title, unless the State’s Attorney files the charge directly as a youthful offender petition in the Family Division.

Subsection (d) effective until July 1, 2022; see also subsection (d) effective July 1, 2022 set out below.

Any proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have committed any offense other than those specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title before attaining 19 years of age shall originate in the Family Division of the Superior Court, provided that jurisdiction may be transferred in accordance with this chapter.

(d)

Subsection (d) effective July 1, 2022; see also subsection (d) effective until July 1, 2022 set out above.

Any proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have committed any offense other than those specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title before attaining 20 years of age shall originate in the Family Division of the Superior Court, provided that jurisdiction may be transferred in accordance with this chapter.

[Repealed.]

If the State requests that custody of the child be transferred to the Department, a temporary care hearing shall be held as provided in subchapter 3 of this chapter.

A petition may be withdrawn by the State’s Attorney at any time prior to the hearing thereon, in which event the child shall be returned to the custodial parent, guardian, or custodian, the proceedings under this chapter terminated, and all files and documents relating thereto sealed under section 5119 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2011, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2017, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. July 1, 2020;

2017, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. July 1, 2022;

2019, No. 45

, § 3, eff. May 30, 2019.

§ 5202.
Order of adjudication; noncriminal.

An order of the Family Division of the Superior Court in proceedings under this chapter shall not:
(a) (1) An order of the Family Division of the Superior Court in proceedings under this chapter shall not:

be deemed a conviction of crime;

impose any civil disabilities sanctions ordinarily resulting from a conviction; or

operate to disqualify the child in any civil service application or appointment.

Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, an order of delinquency in proceedings concerning a child who is alleged to have committed a violation of those sections specified in

23 V.S.A. § 801(a)(1)

shall be an event in addition to those specified therein, enabling the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles to require proof of financial responsibility under 23 V.S.A. chapter 11.

The disposition of a child and evidence given in a hearing in a juvenile proceeding shall not be admissible as evidence against the child in any case or proceeding in any other court except after a subsequent conviction of a felony in proceedings to determine the sentence.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. July 1, 2020.

§ 5203.
Transfer from other courts.

Subsection (a) effective until July 1, 2022; see also subsection (a) effective July 1, 2022 set out below.

If it appears to a Criminal Division of the Superior Court that the defendant was under 19 years of age at the time the offense charged was alleged to have been committed and the offense charged is an offense not specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title, that court shall forthwith transfer the proceeding to the Family Division of the Superior Court under the authority of this chapter, and the minor shall then be considered to be subject to this chapter as a child charged with a delinquent act.

(a)

Subsection (a) effective July 1, 2022; see also subsection (a) effective until July 1, 2022 set out above.

If it appears to a Criminal Division of the Superior Court that the defendant was under 20 years of age at the time the offense charged was alleged to have been committed and the offense charged is an offense not specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title, that court shall forthwith transfer the proceeding to the Family Division of the Superior Court under the authority of this chapter, and the minor shall then be considered to be subject to this chapter as a child charged with a delinquent act.

If it appears to a Criminal Division of the Superior Court that the defendant had attained 14 years of age but not 18 years of age at the time an offense specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title was alleged to have been committed, that court may forthwith transfer the proceeding to the Family Division of the Superior Court under the authority of this chapter, and the minor shall then be considered to be subject to this chapter as a child charged with a delinquent act.

Subsection (c) effective until July 1, 2022; see also subsection (c) effective July 1, 2022 set out below.

If it appears to the State’s Attorney that the defendant was under 19 years of age at the time the felony offense charged was alleged to have been committed and the felony charged is not an offense specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title, the State’s Attorney shall file charges in the Family Division of the Superior Court, pursuant to section 5201 of this title. The Family Division may transfer the proceeding to the Criminal Division pursuant to section 5204 of this title.

(c)

Subsection (c) effective July 1, 2022; see also subsection (c) effective until July 1, 2022 set out above.

If it appears to the State’s Attorney that the defendant was under 20 years of age at the time the felony offense charged was alleged to have been committed and the felony charged is not an offense specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title, the State’s Attorney shall file charges in the Family Division of the Superior Court, pursuant to section 5201 of this title. The Family Division may transfer the proceeding to the Criminal Division pursuant to section 5204 of this title.

A transfer under this section shall include a transfer and delivery of a copy of the accusatory pleading and other papers, documents, and transcripts of testimony relating to the case. Upon any such transfer, that court shall order that the defendant be taken forthwith to a place of detention designated by the Family Division of the Superior Court or to that court itself, or shall release the child to the custody of his or her parent or guardian or other person legally responsible for the child, to be brought before the Family Division of the Superior Court at a time designated by that court. The Family Division of the Superior Court shall then proceed as provided in this chapter as if a petition alleging delinquency had been filed with the court under section 5223 of this title on the effective date of such transfer.

Motions to transfer a case to the Family Division of the Superior Court for youthful offender treatment shall be made under section 5281 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 226, 238;

2011, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2017, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 30, 2018;

2017, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. July 1, 2020; 2017, No. 201 (Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 5204.
Transfer from Family Division of the Superior Court.

Subsection (a) effective until July 1, 2022; see also subsection (a) effective July 1, 2022 set out below.

After a petition has been filed alleging delinquency, upon motion of the State’s Attorney and after hearing, the Family Division of the Superior Court may transfer jurisdiction of the proceeding to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, if the child had attained 16 years of age but not 19 years of age at the time the act was alleged to have occurred and the delinquent act set forth in the petition is a felony not specified in subdivisions (1)-(12) of this subsection or if the child had attained 12 years of age but not 14 years of age at the time the act was alleged to have occurred, and if the delinquent act set forth in the petition was any of the following:

(a)

Subsection (a) effective July 1, 2022; see also subsection (a) effective until July 1, 2022 set out above.
After a petition has been filed alleging delinquency, upon motion of the State’s Attorney and after hearing, the Family Division of the Superior Court may transfer jurisdiction of the proceeding to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, if the child had attained 16 years of age but not 20 years of age at the time the act was alleged to have occurred and the delinquent act set forth in the petition is a felony not specified in subdivisions (1)-(12) of this subsection or if the child had attained 12 years of age but not 14 years of age at the time the act was alleged to have occurred, and if the delinquent act set forth in the petition was any of the following:

arson causing death as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 501

;

assault and robbery with a dangerous weapon as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 608(b)

;

assault and robbery causing bodily injury as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 608(c)

;

aggravated assault as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 1024

;

murder as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 2301

;

manslaughter as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 2304

;

kidnapping as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 2405

;

unlawful restraint as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 2406

or 2407;

maiming as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 2701

;

sexual assault as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 3252(a)(1)

or (a)(2);

aggravated sexual assault as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 3253

; or

burglary into an occupied dwelling as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 1201(c)

.

The State’s Attorney of the county where the juvenile petition is pending may move in the Family Division of the Superior Court for an order transferring jurisdiction under subsection (a) of this section at any time prior to adjudication on the merits. The filing of the motion to transfer jurisdiction shall automatically stay the time for the hearing provided for in section 5225 of this title, which stay shall remain in effect until such time as the Family Division of the Superior Court may deny the motion to transfer jurisdiction.

Upon the filing of a motion to transfer jurisdiction under subsection (b) of this section, the Family Division of the Superior Court shall conduct a hearing in accordance with procedures specified in subchapter 2 of this chapter to determine whether:

there is probable cause to believe that the child committed the charged offense; and

public safety and the interests of the community would not be served by treatment of the child under the provisions of law relating to the Family Division of the Superior Court and delinquent children.

In making its determination as required under subsection (c) of this section, the court may consider, among other matters:

the maturity of the child as determined by consideration of his or her age, home, environment; emotional, psychological, and physical maturity; and relationship with and adjustment to school and the community;

the extent and nature of the child’s prior record of delinquency;

the nature of past treatment efforts and the nature of the child’s response to them;

whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated, or willful manner;

the nature of any personal injuries resulting from or intended to be caused by the alleged act;

the prospects for rehabilitation of the child by use of procedures, services, and facilities available through juvenile proceedings;

whether the protection of the community would be better served by transferring jurisdiction from the Family Division to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court.

A transfer under this section shall terminate the jurisdiction of the Family Division of the Superior Court over the child only with respect to those delinquent acts alleged in the petition with respect to which transfer was sought.

The Family Division, following completion of the transfer hearing, shall make findings and, if the court orders transfer of jurisdiction from the Family Division, shall state the reasons for that order. If the Family Division orders transfer of jurisdiction, the child shall be treated as an adult. The State’s Attorney shall commence criminal proceedings as in cases commenced against adults.
(f) (1) The Family Division, following completion of the transfer hearing, shall make findings and, if the court orders transfer of jurisdiction from the Family Division, shall state the reasons for that order. If the Family Division orders transfer of jurisdiction, the child shall be treated as an adult. The State’s Attorney shall commence criminal proceedings as in cases commenced against adults.

Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the parties may stipulate to a transfer of jurisdiction from the Family Division at any time after a motion to transfer is made pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. The court shall not be required to make findings if the parties stipulate to a transfer pursuant to this subdivision. Upon acceptance of the stipulation to transfer jurisdiction, the court shall transfer the proceedings to the Criminal Division and the child shall be treated as an adult. The State’s Attorney shall commence criminal proceedings as in cases commenced against adults.

The order granting or denying transfer of jurisdiction shall constitute a final order within the meaning of Rules 3 and 4 of the Vermont Rules of Appellate Procedure.

If a person who has not attained 16 years of age at the time of the alleged offense has been prosecuted as an adult and is not convicted of one of the acts listed in subsection (a) of this section but is convicted only of one or more lesser offenses, jurisdiction shall be transferred to the Family Division of the Superior Court for disposition. A conviction under this subsection shall be considered an adjudication of delinquency and not a conviction of crime, and the entire matter shall be treated as if it had remained in the Family Division throughout. In case of an acquittal for a matter specified in this subsection and in case of a transfer to the Family Division under this subsection, the court shall order the sealing of all applicable files and records of the court, and such order shall be carried out as provided in subsection 5119(e) of this title.

If a juvenile 16 years of age or older has been prosecuted as an adult for an offense not listed in subsection (a) of this section and is not convicted of a felony, but is convicted of a lesser included misdemeanor, jurisdiction shall be transferred to the Family Division of the Superior Court for disposition. A conviction under this subsection shall be considered an adjudication of delinquency and not a conviction of a crime, and the entire matter shall be treated as if it had remained in the Family Division throughout. In case of an acquittal for a matter specified in this subsection and in case of a transfer to the Family Division under this subsection, the court shall order the sealing of all applicable files and records of the court, and such order shall be carried out as provided in subsection 5119(e) of this title.

The record of a hearing conducted under subsection (c) of this section and any related files shall be open to inspection only by persons specified in subsections 5117(b) and (c) of this title in accordance with section 5119 of this title and by the attorney for the child.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238;

2011, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. January 1, 2017;

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2017, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. July 1, 2020;

2017, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 5204a.
Jurisdiction over adult defendant for crime committed when defendant was under 19 years of age.

A proceeding may be commenced in the Family Division against a defendant who has attained 18 years of age if:

the petition alleges that the defendant:

before attaining 19 years of age, violated a crime listed in subsection 5204(a) of this title;

after attaining 14 years of age but before attaining 19 years of age, committed an offense listed in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

but not listed in subsection 5204(a) of this title; or

after attaining 17 years of age but before attaining 19 years of age, committed any offense not listed in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

or subsection 5204(a) of this title, provided the petition is filed prior to the defendant’s 19th birthday;

a juvenile petition was never filed based upon the alleged conduct; and

the statute of limitations has not tolled on the crime that the defendant is alleged to have committed.

The Family Division shall, except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, transfer a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section to the Criminal Division if the Family Division finds that:
(b) (1) The Family Division shall, except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, transfer a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section to the Criminal Division if the Family Division finds that:

there is probable cause to believe that while the defendant was less than 19 years of age he or she committed an act listed in subsection 5204(a) of this title;

there was good cause for not filing a delinquency petition in the Family Division when the defendant was less than 19 years of age;

there has not been an unreasonable delay in filing the petition; and

transfer would be in the interest of justice and public safety.

If a petition has been filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, the Family Division may order that the defendant be treated as a youthful offender consistent with the applicable provisions of chapter 52A of this title if the defendant is under 22 years of age and the Family Division:
(2) (A) If a petition has been filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, the Family Division may order that the defendant be treated as a youthful offender consistent with the applicable provisions of chapter 52A of this title if the defendant is under 22 years of age and the Family Division:

makes the findings required by subdivisions (1)(A), (B), and (C) of this subsection (b);

finds that the youth is amenable to treatment or rehabilitation as a youthful offender; and

finds that there are sufficient services in the Family Division system and the Department for Children and Families or the Department of Corrections to meet the youth’s treatment and rehabilitation needs.

If the Family Division orders that the defendant be treated as a youthful offender, the court shall approve a disposition case plan and impose conditions of probation on the defendant.

If the Family Division finds after hearing that the defendant has violated the terms of his or her probation, the Family Division may:

maintain the defendant’s status as a youthful offender, with modified conditions of probation if the court deems it appropriate; or

revoke the defendant’s youthful offender status and transfer the petition to the Criminal Division pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection (b).

The Family Division shall in all respects treat a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section in the same manner as a petition filed pursuant to section 5201 of this title, except that the Family Division’s jurisdiction shall end on or before the defendant’s 22nd birthday, if the Family Division:

finds that there is probable cause to believe that, after attaining 14 years of age but before attaining 19 years of age, the defendant committed an offense listed in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

but not listed in subsection 5204(a) of this title; and

makes the findings required by subdivisions (b)(1)(B) and (C) of this section.

In making the determination required by subdivision (1)(D) of this subsection, the court may consider, among other matters:

the maturity of the defendant as determined by consideration of his or her age; home; environment; emotional, psychological, and physical maturity; and relationship with and adjustment to school and the community;

the extent and nature of the defendant’s prior criminal record and record of delinquency;

the nature of past treatment efforts and the nature of the defendant’s response to them;

whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated, or willful manner;

the nature of any personal injuries resulting from or intended to be caused by the alleged act;

whether the protection of the community would be best served by transferring jurisdiction from the Family Division to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court.

If the Family Division does not transfer a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section to the Criminal Division or order that the defendant be treated as a youthful offender pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the petition shall be dismissed.

The Family Division shall treat a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section in all respects in the same manner as a petition filed pursuant to section 5201 of this title if the court:
(d) (1) The Family Division shall treat a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section in all respects in the same manner as a petition filed pursuant to section 5201 of this title if the court:

finds that there is probable cause to believe that, after attaining 17 years of age but before attaining 18 years of age, the defendant committed an offense not listed in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

or subsection 5204(a) of this title; and

makes the findings required by subdivisions (b)(1)(B) and (C) of this section.

The Family Division’s jurisdiction over cases filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section shall end on or before the defendant’s 20th birthday.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 16

, § 2, eff. May 9, 2011; amended

2019, No. 77

, § 23, eff. June 19, 2019;

2019, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2021, No. 65

, § 16, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 5205.
Fingerprints; photographs.

Fingerprint files of a child under the jurisdiction of the court shall be kept separate from those of other persons under special security measures. Inspection of such files shall be limited to law enforcement officers only on a need-to-know basis unless otherwise authorized by the court in individual cases.

Copies of fingerprints shall be maintained on a local basis only and not sent to central State or federal depositories except in national security cases.

Fingerprints of persons under the jurisdiction of the court shall be removed and destroyed when:

the petition alleging delinquency with respect to which such fingerprints were taken does not result in an adjudication of delinquency; or

jurisdiction of the court is terminated, provided that there has been no record of a criminal offense by the child after reaching 16 years of age.

If latent prints are found at the scene of an offense and there is reason to believe that a particular child was involved, the child may be fingerprinted for purposes of immediate comparison, and, if the result is negative, the fingerprint card shall be immediately destroyed.

No photograph shall be taken of any child when taken into custody without the consent of the judge unless the case is transferred for criminal proceeding.

A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2015, No. 23

, § 15.

§ 5206. Section 5206 effective until July 1, 2022; see also section 5206 effective July 1, 2022 set out below. Citation of 16- to 18-year-olds.

If a child was over 16 years of age and under 19 years of age at the time the offense was alleged to have been committed and the offense is not specified in subsection (b) of this section, law enforcement shall cite the child to the Family Division of the Superior Court.
(a) (1) If a child was over 16 years of age and under 19 years of age at the time the offense was alleged to have been committed and the offense is not specified in subsection (b) of this section, law enforcement shall cite the child to the Family Division of the Superior Court.

If, after the child is cited to the Family Division, the State’s Attorney chooses to file the charge in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, the State’s Attorney shall state in the information the reason why filing in the Criminal Division is in the interest of justice.

Offenses for which a law enforcement officer is not required to cite a child to the Family Division of the Superior Court shall include:

23 V.S.A. §§ 674

(driving while license suspended or revoked), 1128 (accidents- duty to stop), and 1133 (eluding a police officer);

fish and wildlife offenses that are not minor violations as defined by

10 V.S.A. § 4572

; and

an offense listed in subsection 5204(a) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 17; amended

2019, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2019, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 5206. Section 5206 effective July 1, 2022; see also section 5206 effective until July 1, 2022 set out above. Citation of 16- to 19-year-olds.

If a child was over 16 years of age and under 20 years of age at the time the offense was alleged to have been committed and the offense is not specified in subsection (b) of this section, law enforcement shall cite the child to the Family Division of the Superior Court.
(a) (1) If a child was over 16 years of age and under 20 years of age at the time the offense was alleged to have been committed and the offense is not specified in subsection (b) of this section, law enforcement shall cite the child to the Family Division of the Superior Court.

If, after the child is cited to the Family Division, the State’s Attorney chooses to file the charge in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, the State’s Attorney shall state in the information the reason why filing in the Criminal Division is in the interest of justice.

Offenses for which a law enforcement officer is not required to cite a child to the Family Division of the Superior Court shall include:

23 V.S.A. §§ 674

(driving while license suspended or revoked), 1128 (accidents- duty to stop), and 1133 (eluding a police officer);

fish and wildlife offenses that are not minor violations as defined by

10 V.S.A. § 4572

; and

an offense listed in subsection 5204(a) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 17; amended

2019, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2019, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. July 1, 2022.